Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60K.383, is amended to read: 60K.383 TRAVEL INSURANCE. Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) As used in this section, the terms in paragraphs (b) to deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end have the meanings given. new text begin (b) "Limited lines travel insurance producer" means a licensed managing general agent or third-party administrator; licensed insurance producer, including a limited lines producer; or travel administrator, as defined in section 65C.02, subdivision 13. new text end new text begin (c) "Offer and disseminate" means providing general information, including a description of coverage and price, as well as processing an application and collecting premiums. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Travel insurance" means insurance coverage for personal risks incident to planned travel, includingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end but not limited to: (1) interruption or cancellation of trip or event; (2) loss of baggage or personal effects; (3) damages to accommodations or rental vehicles; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during traveldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5) emergency evacuation; new text end new text begin (6) repatriation of remains; or new text end new text begin (7) a contractual obligation to indemnify or pay a specified amount of money to the traveler upon determinable contingencies related to travel, as approved by the commissioner. new text end Travel insurance does not include major medical plans, which provide comprehensive medical protection for travelers with trips lasting six months or longer, including those working overseas as an expatriate or military personnel being deployednew text begin , or a product that requires a specific insurance producer licensenew text end . deleted text begin (c) "Travel insurance producer" means an insurer designee, such as a managing general underwriter, managing general agent, or licensed limited lines producer of travel insurance. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Travel retailer" means a business entity that deleted text begin offers and disseminatesdeleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) makes, arranges, or offers planned travel; and new text end new text begin (2) may offer and disseminatenew text end travel insurance new text begin as a service to the travel retailer's customers new text end on behalf of and under the direction of a new text begin limited lines new text end travel insurance producer. Subd. 2. deleted text begin Travel retailer licensedeleted text end new text begin Licensing and registrationnew text end . new text begin (a) The commissioner may issue a limited lines travel insurance producer license to an individual or business entity that has filed with the commissioner a limited lines travel insurance producer license application in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. A limited lines travel insurance producer must be licensed to sell, solicit, or negotiate travel insurance through a licensed insurer. A person is prohibited from acting as a limited lines travel insurance producer or travel insurance retailer unless the person is licensed or registered. new text end new text begin (b) new text end A travel retailer may offer and disseminate travel insurance on behalf of and under a new text begin limited lines new text end travel insurance producer business entity license only if deleted text begin the travel insurance producer holds a business entity license, anddeleted text end : deleted text begin (1) the licensed business entity is clearly identified as the licensed producer on marketing materials and fulfillment packages distributed by travel retailers to customers; identification shall include the entity's name and contact information; deleted text end new text begin (1) the limited lines travel insurance producer or travel retailer provides to travel insurance purchasers: new text end new text begin (i) a description of the material terms or the actual material terms of the insurance coverage; new text end new text begin (ii) a description of the process to file a claim; new text end new text begin (iii) a description of the process to review or cancel the travel insurance policy; and new text end new text begin (iv) the identity and contact information of the insurer and limited lines travel insurance producer; new text end (2) the deleted text begin licensed business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end keeps a registernew text begin , on a form prescribed by the commissioner,new text end of each travel retailer that offers travel insurance on the licensed business entity's behalf. The register new text begin must be maintained and updated by the limited lines travel insurance producer and new text end must include new text begin (i) new text end the namenew text begin , address,new text end and contact information of the travel retailer and an officer or person who directs or controls the travel retailer's operations, and new text begin (ii) new text end the travel retailer's federal deleted text begin Employerdeleted text end new text begin Taxnew text end Identification Number. The deleted text begin licensed business entity shalldeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producer mustnew text end also certify that the travel retailer registered complies with United States Code, title 18, section 1033. The deleted text begin licensed business entity shalldeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producer mustnew text end submit the register within 30 days upon request by the commissionernew text begin . Section 60K.43, subdivisions 1, 3, and 4, apply to the limited lines travel insurance producers and travel retailersnew text end ; (3) the deleted text begin licensed business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end has designated one of its employees deleted text begin asdeleted text end new text begin who isnew text end a licensed individual producerdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin asnew text end a "designated responsible producer" or "DRPdeleted text begin ,deleted text end " responsible for the business entity's compliance with Minnesota insurance laws and rules; (4) the DRP, president, secretary, treasurer, and any other officer or person who directs or controls the deleted text begin licensed business entity'sdeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producer'snew text end insurance operations deleted text begin complydeleted text end new text begin compliesnew text end with the fingerprinting requirements applicable to insurance producers in the resident state of the deleted text begin business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end ; (5) the deleted text begin licensed business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end has paid all applicable insurance producer licensing fees deleted text begin asdeleted text end set forth in Minnesota deleted text begin statedeleted text end law; and (6) the deleted text begin licensed business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end requires each employee new text begin and authorized representative new text end of the travel retailer whose duties include offering and disseminating travel insurance to receive a program of instruction or training, which may be subject to review by the commissioner.new text begin The training materials must, at a minimum, contain adequate instruction regarding the types of insurance offered, ethical sales practices, and required disclosures provided to prospective customers.new text end new text begin (c) A travel retailer offering or disseminating travel insurance must make available to prospective purchasers a brochure or other written materials that have been approved by the travel insurer. The materials must include information that, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) provides the identity and contact information of the insurer and the limited lines travel insurance producer; new text end new text begin (2) explains that a person is not required to purchase travel insurance in order to purchase any other product or service from the travel retailer; and new text end new text begin (3) explains that an unlicensed travel retailer is permitted to provide only general information about the insurance offered by the travel retailer, including a description of the coverage and price, but is not qualified or authorized to (i) answer technical questions about the terms and conditions of the insurance offered by the travel retailer, or (ii) evaluate the adequacy of the customer's existing insurance coverage. new text end new text begin (d) A travel retailer employee or authorized representative who is not licensed as an insurance producer is prohibited from: new text end new text begin (1) evaluating or interpreting the technical terms, benefits, and conditions contained in the offered travel insurance coverage; new text end new text begin (2) evaluating or providing advice concerning a prospective purchaser's existing insurance coverage; or new text end new text begin (3) representing that the travel retailer employee or authorized representative is a licensed insurer, licensed producer, or insurance expert. new text end Subd. 3. Offer and dissemination of travel insurance; compensation. new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, new text end a travel retailer whose new text begin insurance-related new text end activities, and those of its employeesnew text begin and authorized representativesnew text end , are limited to offering and disseminating travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of a deleted text begin licensed business entitydeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producernew text end meeting the conditions stated in this sectiondeleted text begin ,deleted text end is authorized to do so and receive related compensationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end upon registration by the deleted text begin licensed business entity. For purposes of this section, "offering and disseminating" means providing general information, including a description of the coverage and price, as well as processing the application, collecting premiums, and performing other nonlicensable activities permitted by the statedeleted text end new text begin limited lines travel insurance producer as provided under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (2)new text end . Subd. 4. Insurer designee. As the deleted text begin insurerdeleted text end new text begin insurer'snew text end designee, the new text begin limited lines new text end travel insurance producer is responsible for the acts of the travel retailernew text begin and must use reasonable means to ensure compliance by the travel retailer with this section and chapter 65Cnew text end . new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Producers of major lines of insurance. new text end new text begin A person licensed in a major line of authority as an insurance producer is authorized to sell, solicit, and negotiate travel insurance. A property and casualty insurance producer is not required to be appointed by an insurer in order to sell, solicit, or negotiate travel insurance. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [65C.01] SCOPE AND PURPOSES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of this chapter is to promote the public welfare by creating a comprehensive legal framework within which travel insurance may be sold in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) This chapter applies to: new text end new text begin (1) travel insurance that covers any Minnesota resident and is sold, solicited, negotiated, or offered in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) policies and certificates that are delivered or issued for delivery in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) This chapter does not apply to cancellation fee waivers or travel assistance services, except as expressly provided in this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Applicability of other law. new text end new text begin All other applicable provisions of Minnesota insurance law apply to travel insurance, except that this chapter supersedes any general provisions of law that would otherwise apply to travel insurance. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [65C.02] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Aggregator site. new text end new text begin "Aggregator site" means a website that provides access to information, including product and insurer information, regarding insurance products from more than one insurer for use in comparison shopping. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Blanket travel insurance. new text end new text begin "Blanket travel insurance" means a travel insurance policy issued to an eligible group providing coverage for specific classes of persons defined in the policy, with coverage provided to all members of the eligible group without a separate charge to individual members of the eligible group. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Cancellation fee waiver. new text end new text begin "Cancellation fee waiver" means a contractual agreement between a travel services supplier and the travel services supplier's customer to waive some or all of the nonrefundable cancellation fee provisions contained in the supplier's underlying travel contract, with or without regard to the reason for the cancellation or form of reimbursement. A cancellation fee waiver is not insurance. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of commerce. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Eligible group. new text end new text begin "Eligible group" means two or more persons who are engaged in a common enterprise or have an economic, educational, or social affinity or relationship, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) an entity engaged in the business of providing travel or travel services, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) a tour operator, lodging provider, vacation property owner, hotel, resort, travel club, travel agency, property manager, cultural exchange program, and common carrier; or new text end new text begin (ii) the operator, owner, or lessor of a means of transporting passengers, including but not limited to an airline, cruise line, railroad, steamship company, and public bus carrier, if all group members or customers have a common exposure to the risk attendant to the particular type of travel; new text end new text begin (2) a college, school, or other institution of learning covering students, teachers, employees, or volunteers; new text end new text begin (3) an employer covering a group of employees, volunteers, contractors, board of directors, dependents, or guests; new text end new text begin (4) a sports team, camp, or sports team or camp sponsor covering participants, members, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, or volunteers; new text end new text begin (5) a religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic organization, or branch of a religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic organization covering any group of members, participants, or volunteers; new text end new text begin (6) a financial institution, financial institution vendor, parent holding company, trustee, or agent or designee of one or more financial institutions or financial institution vendors, including account holders, credit card holders, debtors, guarantors, or purchasers; new text end new text begin (7) an incorporated or unincorporated association, including a labor union, that (i) has a common interest, constitution, and bylaws, and (ii) is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance for members or participants of the association covering the association's members; new text end new text begin (8) a trust or the trustees of a fund established, created, or maintained for the benefit of and to cover members, employees, or customers, subject to the commissioner authorizing the use of a trust by one or more associations meeting the requirements under clause (7); new text end new text begin (9) an entertainment production company covering a group of participants, volunteers, audience members, contestants, or workers; new text end new text begin (10) a volunteer fire department, ambulance, rescue, police, court, first aid, civil defense, or other volunteer group; new text end new text begin (11) a preschool, day care institution for children or adults, or senior citizen club; new text end new text begin (12) an automobile or truck rental or leasing company covering a group of individuals who may become renters, lessees, or passengers as defined by the group of individuals' travel status on the rented or leased vehicles. The common carrier, operator, owner or lessor of a means of transportation, or automobile or truck rental or leasing company is the policyholder under a policy governed by this section; or new text end new text begin (13) any other group the commissioner determines (i) is engaged in a common enterprise or has an economic, educational, or social affinity or relationship, and (ii) that policy issuance is not contrary to the public interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Fulfillment materials. new text end new text begin "Fulfillment materials" means documentation sent to a person who purchases a travel protection plan that confirms the purchase and provides the travel protection plan's coverage and assistance details. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Group travel insurance. new text end new text begin "Group travel insurance" means travel insurance issued to an eligible group. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Limited lines travel insurance producer. new text end new text begin "Limited lines travel insurance producer" has the meaning given in section 60K.383, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Offer and disseminate. new text end new text begin "Offer and disseminate" has the meaning given in section 60K.383, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Primary certificate holder. new text end new text begin "Primary certificate holder" means an individual person who elects and purchases travel insurance under a group policy. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Primary policyholder new text end new text begin "Primary policyholder" means an individual person who elects and purchases individual travel insurance. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Travel administrator. new text end new text begin "Travel administrator" means a person who directly or indirectly underwrites; collects charges, collateral, or premiums from; or adjusts or settles claims on residents of Minnesota in connection with travel insurance. A person is not a travel administrator if the person's only actions that otherwise indicate the person is a travel administrator are: new text end new text begin (1) a person works for a travel administrator, to the extent that the person's activities are subject to the travel administrator's supervision and control; new text end new text begin (2) an insurance producer sells insurance or engages in administrative and claims-related activities within the scope of the producer's license; new text end new text begin (3) a travel retailer (i) offers and disseminates travel insurance, and (ii) is registered under the license of a limited lines travel insurance producer under this chapter; new text end new text begin (4) an individual who (i) adjusts or settles claims in the normal course of the individual's practice or employment as an attorney, and (ii) does not collect charges or premiums in connection with insurance coverage; or new text end new text begin (5) a business entity is affiliated with a licensed insurer while acting as a travel administrator for the direct and assumed insurance business of an affiliated insurer. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Travel assistance services. new text end new text begin "Travel assistance services" means noninsurance services (1) for which the consumer is not indemnified based on a fortuitous event, and (2) where providing the service does not result in transfer or shifting of risk that would constitute the business of insurance. Travel assistance services include but are not limited to: security advisories; destination information; vaccination and immunization information services; travel reservation services; entertainment; activity and event planning; translation assistance; emergency messaging; international legal and medical referrals; medical case monitoring; coordination of transportation arrangements; emergency cash transfer assistance; medical prescription replacement assistance; passport and travel document replacement assistance; lost luggage assistance; concierge services; and any other service that is furnished in connection with planned travel. Travel assistance services are not insurance and are not related to insurance. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Travel insurance. new text end new text begin "Travel insurance" has the meaning given in section 60K.383, subdivision 1, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Travel protection plan. new text end new text begin "Travel protection plan" means a plan that provides one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) travel insurance; new text end new text begin (2) travel assistance services; or new text end new text begin (3) cancellation fee waivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Travel retailer. new text end new text begin "Travel retailer" has the meaning given in section 60K.383, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [65C.04] TRAVEL PROTECTION PLANS. new text end new text begin A travel protection plan may be offered at one price for the combined features that the travel protection plan offers in Minnesota if: new text end new text begin (1) the travel protection plan: new text end new text begin (i) clearly discloses to the consumer, at or before the time the travel protection plan is purchased, that the travel protection plan includes travel insurance, travel assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers, as applicable; and new text end new text begin (ii) provides information and an opportunity, at or prior to the time the travel protection plan is purchased, for the consumer to obtain additional information regarding the features and pricing of the travel insurance, travel assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers; and new text end new text begin (2) the fulfillment materials: new text end new text begin (i) describe and delineate the travel insurance, travel assistance services, and cancellation fee waivers in the travel protection plan; and new text end new text begin (ii) include the travel insurance disclosures and the contact information for the persons providing travel assistance services and cancellation fee waivers, as applicable. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [65C.05] SALES PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Other applicable law. new text end new text begin Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person offering travel insurance to residents of Minnesota is subject to sections 72A.17 to 72A.32. If this chapter conflicts with chapters 59A to 79A regarding the sale and marketing of travel insurance and travel protection plans, this chapter prevails. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Illusory travel insurance. new text end new text begin A person that offers or sells a travel insurance policy that could never result in payment of claims for an insured individual under the policy is engaging in an unfair trade practice under sections 72A.17 to 72A.32. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Marketing. new text end new text begin (a) All documents provided to consumers before purchasing travel insurance, including but not limited to sales materials, advertising materials, and marketing materials, must be consistent with the travel insurance policy, including but not limited to forms, endorsements, policies, rate filings, and certificates of insurance. new text end new text begin (b) A person that offers travel insurance policies or certificates that contain preexisting condition exclusions must, before the insurance is purchased, provide a consumer with information and an opportunity to learn more about the preexisting condition exclusions. The information about preexisting condition exclusions must be included in the insurance policy's coverage fulfillment materials. new text end new text begin (c) The fulfillment materials and the information described in section 60K.383, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (1), must be provided to a policyholder or certificate holder as soon as practicable after a travel protection plan is purchased. Unless the insured individual has started a covered trip or filed a claim under the travel insurance coverage, a policyholder or certificate holder may cancel a policy or certificate for a full refund of the travel protection plan price from the date a travel protection plan is purchased until at least: new text end new text begin (1) 15 days after the date the travel protection plan's fulfillment materials are delivered by mail; or new text end new text begin (2) ten days after the date the travel protection plan's fulfillment materials are delivered by means other than mail. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this section, "delivery" means (1) handing fulfillment materials to the policyholder or certificate holder, or (2) sending fulfillment materials by mail or electronic means to the policyholder or certificate holder. new text end new text begin (e) The company must disclose in the policy documentation and fulfillment materials whether the travel insurance is primary or secondary to other applicable coverage. new text end new text begin (f) Travel insurance that is marketed directly to a consumer through an insurer's website or by others through an aggregator site is not an unfair trade practice or other violation of law if an accurate summary or short description of coverage is provided on the web page, provided the consumer has access to the policy's full provisions by electronic means. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Opt out. new text end new text begin A person that offers, solicits, or negotiates travel insurance or travel protection plans on an individual or group basis is prohibited from offering, soliciting, or negotiating travel insurance or travel protection plans by using negative option or opting out that requires a consumer to take an affirmative action to deselect coverage, including by unchecking a box on an electronic form, when the consumer purchases a trip. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Other prohibitions. new text end new text begin A person that markets blanket travel insurance coverage as free of cost is engaging in an unfair trade practice. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Coverage required by other jurisdictions. new text end new text begin If a consumer's destination jurisdiction requires insurance coverage, a person does not engage in an unfair trade practice if the person requires a consumer to choose between the following options as a condition of purchasing a trip or travel package: new text end new text begin (1) purchasing the coverage required by the destination jurisdiction through the travel retailer or limited lines travel insurance producer supplying the trip or travel package; or new text end new text begin (2) agreeing to obtain and provide proof of coverage that meets the destination jurisdiction's requirements prior to departure. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [65C.06] TRAVEL ADMINISTRATORS. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding chapters 59A to 79A, a person is prohibited from acting as or representing that the person is a travel administrator for travel insurance in Minnesota unless the person: new text end new text begin (1) is a licensed property and casualty insurance producer in Minnesota for activities permitted under the property and casualty insurance producer license; new text end new text begin (2) holds a valid managing general agent license in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (3) holds a valid third-party administrator license in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) A travel administrator and the travel administrator's employees are exempt from the licensing requirements of chapter 72B for travel insurance the travel administrator administers. new text end new text begin (c) An insurer is responsible for: new text end new text begin (1) the acts of a travel administrator administering travel insurance underwritten by the insurer; and new text end new text begin (2) ensuring the travel administrator maintains all books and records relevant to the insurer that the travel administrator must make available to the commissioner upon request. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [65C.07] POLICY. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding chapters 59A to 79A, travel insurance is classified and filed for purposes of rates and forms under an inland marine line of insurance. Notwithstanding this paragraph, travel insurance that provides coverage for illness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel, either exclusively or in conjunction with related emergency evacuation or repatriation of remains coverage, or incidental limited property and casualty benefits, including baggage or trip cancellation, may be filed under either an accident and health line of insurance or an inland marine line of insurance. new text end new text begin (b) Travel insurance may be offered and issued in the form of an individual, group, or blanket policy. new text end new text begin (c) Eligibility and underwriting standards for travel insurance may be developed and provided based on travel protection plans designed for individual or identified marketing or distribution channels, provided the standards also meet the underwriting standards for an inland marine line of insurance under Minnesota law. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 7 are effective 90 days following the date of final enactment. new text end